New Jersey, session 222, S2045.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: State agency means any of principal departments in the Executive Branch of State government, and any division, board, bureau, office, commission or other instrumentality within or created by such department, and any independent State authority, commission, instrumentality or agency. b.    In each year in which the federal decennial census is taken, up to five State employees in each State agency shall be granted, upon request, a leave of absence to be a census enumerator during that employees work hours.  Upon approval of the request, a leave of absence with pay for no more than 10 work days during the federal decennial census year and an additional leave of absence without pay for no more than 10 work days during the federal decennial census year shall be granted to those State employees to participate in census outreach as a census enumerator. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.